Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-270
Warrant; when issued.

In case the summons cannot be served or the parties fail to obey the summons and, in any case when it shall be made to appear to the court that such summons would be ineffectual, a warrant may issue on the order of the court, either against the parent or guardian or the person having custody of the juvenile, or with whom the juvenile may be, or against the juvenile himself or herself.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 26.